Washington statutes.
RCW 24.06.435

Conducting affairs without registering.

A foreign corporation conducting affairs in this state without registering with the secretary of state is subject to RCW 23.95.505.

[ 2015 c 176 s 4130; 1969 ex.s. c 120 s 87.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Contingent effective date—2015 c 176: See note following RCW 23.95.100.